Arkansas, session 2025, HB1324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-22-711(a)(1), concerning the times of
permissible sales of fireworks, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section,
permissible items of fireworks, defined in § 20-22-708, may be sold at retail
to residents of the State of Arkansas and used within the State of Arkansas
from June 20 June 13 through July 10 and December 10 through January 5 of
each year only.











*JMB109*
01/29/2025 5:00:52 PM JMB109